Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.270

Board of adjustment—Meetings.

The board of adjustment shall hold not less than one regular meeting in each month of each year: PROVIDED, That if no issues over which the board has jurisdiction are pending upon its calendar, a meeting may be canceled.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.270. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 27.]